California statutes. Financial Code
 that licensee to a borrower shall be liable for any misrepresentation made to that borrower in connection with that loan.

(c) The following activities by an unlicensed person are not authorized by this
 section:

(1) Participating in any loan negotiation.

(2) Counseling or advising the borrower about a loan.

(3) Participating in the preparation of any loan documents, including credit applications.

(4) Contacting the licensee on behalf of the borrower other than to refer the borrower.

(5) Gathering loan documentation from the borrower or delivering the documentation to the licensee.

(6) Communicating lending decisions or inquiries to the borrower.

(7) Participating in establishing any sales literature or marketing materials.

(8) Obtaining the borrower’s signature on documents.

(d) The prohibitions in subdivision (c) do not apply if the unlicensed person meets one or more of the following criteria:

(1) Is exempt from licensure under this division.

(2) Is exempt from federal income taxes under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) Is a business assistance organization recognized by the United States Small Business Administration.

(4) Is engaged in
 one or more of the activities described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (c) in connection with five or fewer commercial loans in a 12-month period made by persons licensed under this division.

(e) The commissioner may adopt regulations under this section to impose conditions on the referral activity authorized under this section. The commissioner may classify persons, loans, loan terms, referral methods, and other matters within his or her jurisdiction, and may prescribe different requirements for different classes of loans.

(f) Nothing in this section shall authorize the payment of a referral fee to an unlicensed person for a residential mortgage loan, nor the payment of a referral fee to a person required to be licensed under Section 10131 or 10131.1 of the Business and Professions Code, unless such person is licensed by the Bureau of Real Estate pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(g) For the purposes of this section, “referral” means either the introduction of the borrower and the finance lender or the delivery to the finance lender of the borrower’s contact information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 761, Sec. 1.   (SB 197)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22603.

A licensee that is a finance lender shall provide a prospective borrower who has been referred by an unlicensed person the following written statement, in 10-point font or larger, at the time the licensee receives an application for a commercial loan, and shall require the prospective borrower to acknowledge receipt of the statement in writing:
“You have been referred to us by [Name of Unlicensed Person]. If you are approved for the loan, we may pay a fee to [Name of Unlicensed Person] for the successful referral. [Licensee], and not [Name of Unlicensed Person] is the sole party authorized to offer a loan to you. You should ensure that you understand any loan offer we may extend to you before agreeing to the loan terms. If you wish to report a complaint about this
 loan transaction, you may contact the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation at 1-866-ASK-CORP (1-866-275-2677), or file your complaint online at www.dfpi.ca.gov.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 140.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22604.

(a) Any person that receives compensation in connection with a referral, as described in Section 22602, that leads to the consummation of a commercial loan under this division may not do any of the following:

(1) Make a materially false or misleading statement or representation to a prospective borrower about the terms or conditions of a prospective loan.

(2) Advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or broadcast any statement or representation with regard to the conditions for making or negotiating a loan that is false, misleading, or deceptive, or that omits material information that is necessary
 to make the statements made not false, misleading, or deceptive.

(3) Engage in any act in violation of Section 17200 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) Commit an act that constitutes fraud or dishonest dealings.

(5) Fail to safeguard a prospective borrower’s personally identifiable information.

(b) For purposes of this section, “personally identifiable information” means information that is not publicly available, that a prospective borrower provides for the purpose of obtaining a loan or other financial product. Personally identifiable information includes information a prospective borrower provides on an application to obtain a loan, credit card, or
 other financial product or service.

(c) Whenever, in the opinion of the commissioner, any person is engaged in the business of soliciting borrowers for a loan to be made by a licensee under this division, and the person is not in compliance with this section, Section 22602, Section 22603, or any other provision of this division authorizing such activity or exempting the person from this division, the commissioner may order the person to desist and to refrain from engaging in the business or further violating this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 761, Sec. 3.   (SB 197)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Open-End Credit Programs [22650. - 22650.]

22650.

As used in this division, “open-end credit program” means a licensee’s plan for making open-end loans pursuant to a loan agreement that sets forth the terms and conditions governing the use of the open-end credit program, expressly states that the loan is made pursuant to this article, and provides that:

(a) The borrower may use the open-end credit program to obtain money, goods, labor, or services or credit, and the licensee makes open-end loans to the borrower for the purpose of paying money to,
 or at the direction of, the borrower or paying obligations that the borrower creates through use of the open-end credit program.

(b) The amount of each advance and the charges and other permitted costs are debited to an account.

(c) The charges are computed from time to time on the unpaid balances of the borrower’s account excluding from the computation any unpaid charges other than permitted fees, costs, and expenses.

(d) The borrower has the privilege of paying the account in full at any time.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Program Administrators [22680. - 22697.]

22680.

(a) A person shall not engage in the business of a PACE solicitor unless that person is enrolled with a program administrator pursuant to the requirements of this section.

(b) A program administrator shall establish and maintain a process for enrolling PACE solicitors that is acceptable to the commissioner. That process shall include both of the following:

(1) A written agreement between the program administrator and the PACE solicitor that shall set forth the obligations of the PACE solicitor and its PACE solicitor agents.

(2) A review of readily and publicly available information regarding each PACE solicitor.

(c) A program administrator shall establish and maintain a process for enrolling PACE solicitor agents that is acceptable to the commissioner. That process shall include a background check of each PACE solicitor agent. A program administrator may rely on a background check conducted by the Contractors’ State License Board to comply with this requirement.

(d) A program administrator shall not enroll a PACE solicitor or a PACE solicitor agent that does not satisfy at least one of the following criteria:

(1) Maintain in good standing a license from the Contractors’ State License Board.

(2) Maintain a registration in good standing with the Contractors’ State License Board as a home improvement salesperson.

(3) Be exempt from, or not subject to, licensure or registration under the Contractors’ State License Law (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code).

(e) A program administrator shall not enroll a PACE solicitor if, as a result of the review conducted as part of the program administrator’s enrollment process, the program administrator finds any of the following:

(1) A clear pattern of consumer complaints about the PACE solicitor regarding dishonesty, misrepresentations, or omissions.

(2) A high likelihood that the PACE solicitor will solicit assessment contracts in a manner that does not comply with applicable law.

(3) A clear pattern on the part of the PACE solicitor of failing to timely
 receive and respond to property owner complaints regarding the PACE solicitor.

(f) A program administrator shall establish and maintain a process to promote and evaluate the compliance of PACE solicitors and PACE solicitor agents with the requirements of applicable law that is acceptable to the commissioner. That process shall include all of the following, at a minimum:

(1) A risk-based, commercially reasonable procedure to monitor and test the compliance of PACE solicitors and PACE solicitor agents with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 22689.

(2) A procedure to regularly monitor the license or registration status of PACE solicitors and PACE solicitor agents.

(3) A periodic review of the solicitation activities of PACE solicitors enrolled
 with the program administrator, to be conducted at least once every two years.

(g) A program administrator shall establish and implement a process, which is acceptable to the commissioner, for canceling the enrollment of PACE solicitors and PACE solicitor agents who fail to maintain the minimum qualifications required by this section, or who violate any provision of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 813, Sec. 5.   (AB 2063)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22681.

(a) A program administrator shall establish and maintain a training program for PACE solicitor agents that is acceptable to the commissioner.

(b) A program administrator shall require each PACE solicitor agent to complete an introductory training that addresses the topics listed in subdivision (c) as part of the program administrator’s enrollment process for PACE solicitor agents. The introductory training shall require that the PACE solicitor agent pass a test that measures the PACE solicitor agent’s knowledge and comprehension of the training material. The introductory training shall not be subject to any minimum duration requirements.

(c) In addition to the introductory training, a program
 administrator shall require that each PACE solicitor agent complete six hours of education provided by the program administrator within three months of completing the program administrator’s enrollment process. The training shall include the following topics:

(1) PACE programs and assessment contracts.

(2) PACE disclosures.

(3) Ethics.

(4) Fraud prevention.

(5) Consumer protection.

(6) Nondiscrimination.

(7) Senior financial abuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 813, Sec. 6.   (AB 2063)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22682.

(a) A program administrator shall, in the manner prescribed by the commissioner, timely notify the commissioner of each PACE solicitor and PACE solicitor agent enrolled by the program administrator.

(b) A program administrator shall, in the manner prescribed by the commissioner, timely notify the commissioner of each enrollment cancellation and withdrawal of a PACE solicitor or a PACE solicitor agent pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 22680.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 813, Sec. 7.   (AB 2063)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22683.

A program administrator shall develop and implement policies and procedures for responding to questions and addressing complaints as soon as reasonably practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 71.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 22696.)
-------------------------------------------

22684.

A program administrator shall not execute an assessment contract, and no work shall commence under a home improvement contract that is financed by that assessment contract nor shall that home improvement contract be executed unless the following criteria are satisfied:

(a) All property taxes for the property that will be subject to the assessment contract are current. The program administrator shall ask a property owner whether there has been no more than one late payment of property taxes on the property for the previous three years or since the current owner acquired the property, whichever period is shorter.

(b) The property that will be subject to the assessment contract has no recorded and outstanding involuntary liens
 in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) The property that will be subject to the assessment contract has no notices of default currently recorded that have not been rescinded.

(d) The property owner has not been a party to any bankruptcy proceedings within the last four years, except that the property owner may have been party to a bankruptcy proceeding that was discharged or dismissed between two and four years before the application date and the property owner has had no payments more than 30 days past due on any mortgage debt or nonmortgage debt, excluding medical debt, during the 12 months immediately preceding the application date.

(e) The property owner is current on all mortgage debt on the subject property and has no more than one late payment during the six months immediately preceding the
 application date and if the late payment did not exceed 30 days past due.

(f) The property that will be subject to the assessment contract is within the geographical boundaries of the applicable PACE program.

(g) The measures to be installed pursuant to the assessment contract are eligible under the terms of the applicable PACE program.

(h) The financing is for less than 15 percent of the value of the property, up to the first seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) inclusive of the existing assessments, and is for less than 10 percent of the remaining value of the property above seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000).

(i) The total PACE assessments and the mortgage-related debt on the property subject to the PACE assessment will not exceed 97
 percent of the market value of the property as established by the valuation required by Section 22685.

(j) The term of the assessment contract shall not exceed the estimated useful life of the measure to which the greatest portion of funds disbursed under the assessment contract is attributable. The program administrator shall determine useful life for purposes of this subdivision based upon credible third-party standards or certification criteria that have been established by appropriate government agencies or nationally recognized standards and testing organizations.

(k) The program administrator shall verify the existence of recorded PACE assessments and shall ask if the property owner has authorized additional PACE assessments on the same subject property that have not yet been recorded. The failure of a property owner to comply with this subdivision shall not invalidate an
 assessment contract or any obligations thereunder, notwithstanding if the combined amount of the PACE assessments exceed the criteria set forth in subdivision (h) or (i). The existence of a prior PACE assessment or a prior assessment contract shall not constitute evidence that the assessment contract under consideration is affordable or meets any other program requirements.

(l) The assessment contract does not contain a penalty for early repayment of an amount owed under the contract. 

(m) The property that will be subject to the assessment contract is not subject to a reverse mortgage, as defined in Section 1923 of the Civil Code.

(n) The program administrator shall use commercially reasonable and available methods to verify the above.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 156, Sec. 1.   (AB 1551)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

22685.

(a) A program administrator shall derive market value using one of the following:

(1) Automated valuation models, using the following criteria:

(A) Each automated valuation model must be provided by a third-party vendor.

(B) Each automated valuation model must have estimation models with confidence scores and regular statistical calibration by the third-party vendor.

(C) The program administrator shall utilize at least three automated valuation models for each property. The estimated value for each model shall be the average between the high and low values, if a range is
 provided.

(D) The program administrator shall utilize the estimated value with the highest confidence score for a property. If an automated valuation model meeting the criteria of subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) does not obtain a confidence score for a subject property, the PACE program shall utilize the average of all estimated values.

(2) An appraisal conducted within six months of the application date by a state-licensed or state-certified real estate appraiser licensed pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 11300) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code. A program administrator may rely upon an appraisal obtained from a property owner if that appraisal was conducted in accordance with applicable laws and regulations by a state-licensed or state-certified appraiser in connection with a consumer credit transaction secured by the subject property, including the
 purchase or refinance of the subject property or the extension of an equity line of credit secured by the subject property.

(b) The market value determination by the program administrator shall be disclosed to the property owner prior to signing the assessment contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 798, Sec. 6.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22686.

A program administrator shall not execute an assessment contract, and no work shall commence under a home improvement contract that is financed by that assessment contract nor shall that home improvement contract be executed unless the program administrator makes a reasonable good faith determination that the property owner has a reasonable ability to pay the annual payment obligations for the PACE assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 813, Sec. 9.   (AB 2063)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22687.

(a) A program administrator shall determine before executing an assessment contract, and no work shall commence under a home improvement contract that is financed by that assessment contract nor shall that home improvement contract be executed until this determination is made, that the property owner has a reasonable ability to pay the annual payment obligations for the PACE assessment based on the property owner’s income, assets, and current debt obligations. The determination process shall be based on the following factors:

(1) The property owner shall submit on their application their monthly income and their monthly housing expenses.

(2) Housing expenses shall include all mortgage principal and
 interest payments, insurance, property taxes, mortgage guaranty insurance, and other preexisting fees and assessments on the property.

(3) Household income shall include the income of the mortgagor on the subject property and may include the income of any persons 18 years of age or older who are on title to the property. In complying with this paragraph, the program administrator shall do both of the following:

(A) The program administrator may also utilize the income of a property owner’s legal spouse through marriage, as defined by Division 3 (commencing with Section 300) of the Family Code, or domestic partnership, as defined by Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 297) of the Family Code, who is not on title to the property. Any spouse or domestic partner who is not on title to the property shall consent, in writing, to the inclusion of his or her income and to the
 verification of his or income as required pursuant to this section.

(B) For any person whose income is considered, the program administrator shall also consider their debt obligations pursuant to this section. The program administrator is not required to consider more income than is necessary, nor to verify assets if verified income is sufficient to determine the ability of the property owner to pay the annual payment obligations.

(4) Debt obligations in accordance with subdivision (c).

(5) In evaluating the income, assets, and current debt obligations of the property owner, the program administrator shall not consider the equity of the property that will secure the assessment contract.

(6) Pursuant to Section 5913 of the Streets and Highways Code, the
 program administrator shall ask the homeowner open-ended questions during the oral confirmation of key terms call, to confirm the income provided on the application and to identify the sources of their income.

(b) (1) The program administrator shall determine and consider the current or reasonably expected income or assets of the property owner that the program administrator relies on in order to determine a property owner’s ability to pay the PACE assessment annual payment obligations using reasonably reliable third-party records of the property owner’s income or assets. The program administrator may use automated verification provided the source of that verification is specific to the income of the property owner and not based on predictive or estimation methodologies, and has been determined sufficient for those verification purposes by a federal mortgage lending authority or regulator. Examples of records the program
 administrator may use to verify the property owner’s income or assets include:

(A) A pay stub showing the most recent 30-day pay period or financial institution records showing regular deposits consistent with reported income for the most recent 60 days.

(B) Copies of the most recent tax returns the property owner filed with the Internal Revenue Service or the Franchise Tax Board.

(C) Copies of the most recent Internal Revenue Service Form W-2 (Wage and Tax Statement), or other similar Internal Revenue Service forms that are used for reporting wages or tax withholding.

(D) Payroll statements, including the Department of Defense Leave and Earnings Statement (LES).

(E) Financial institution
 records, such as bank statements or investment account statements reflecting the value of particular assets.

(F) Records from the property owner’s employer or a third party that obtained income information from the employer.

(G) Records from a federal, state, or local government agency stating the property owner’s income from benefits or entitlements. Income from benefits paid by a government entity shall not include any benefits for which the recipient must satisfy a means test or any cash equivalent nonmonetary benefits, such as food stamps.

(2) Income may not be derived from any of the following:

(A) Temporary sources of income.

(B) Nonliquid assets.

(C) Proceeds derived from the equity from the subject property.

(c) A program administrator shall consider the monthly debt obligations of the property owner to determine a property owner’s ability to pay the annual payment PACE assessment obligations using reasonably reliable third-party records, including one or more consumer credit reports from agencies that meet the requirements of Section 1681a(p) of Title 15 of the United States Code. Program administrators shall use at least a two-file Merged Credit Report (MCR) or a Residential Mortgage Credit Report (RMCR). For purposes of this subdivision, monthly debt obligations include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) All secured and unsecured debt.

(2) Alimony.

(3) Child support.

(4) Monthly housing expenses. If property tax and insurance obligations are not included in a property owner’s escrow, a program administrator shall use reasonably reliable methods to determine these obligations.

(d) In calculating the ability of the property owner to pay the annual payment obligations, the program administrator shall determine that the property owner’s income is sufficient to meet:

(1) The PACE payment, including all interest and fees.

(2) Any mortgage payments, as defined by the higher of the borrower’s self-reported housing payment or housing expenses determined in accordance with paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(3) All existing debts and obligations as identified in subdivision (c).

(4) Sufficient residual income to meet basic household living expenses, defined as expected expenses which may be variable based on circumstances and consumption patterns of the household. A program administrator may make reasonable estimation of basic living expenses based on the number of persons in the household. Examples of basic living expenses include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) Food and other necessary household consumables.

(B) Transportation costs to work or school, including fuel costs, auto insurance and maintenance costs, and public transit costs.

(C) Utilities expenses for telecommunication,
 water, sewage, electricity, and gas.

(e) In the case of emergency or immediate necessity, the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may be waived, in accordance with the requirements of Section 5940 of the Streets and Highways Code, for the funding and recordation of a PACE assessment to finance a heating, ventilation, and air conditioning (HVAC) system, boiler, or other system whose primary function is temperature regulation in a home if all of the following are met:

(1) The program administrator first attempted to use an automated means of verification as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(2) If the program administrator was unable to verify the property owner’s income pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), pursuant to Section 5913 of the Streets and Highways Code, the program
 administrator shall ask the property owner open-ended questions during the oral confirmation of key terms call to identify their income and the sources of their income. The program administrator shall comply with the requirements of subdivision (a), paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and subdivisions (c) and (d).

(3) The funding is limited to the emergency or immediate necessity improvement and any required improvements directly necessary to the installation and safe operation of the improvement.

(4) Any efficiency improvement funded is eligible for PACE financing.

(5) The property owner executes a waiver of their right to cancel pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5940 of the Streets and Highways Code, and confirms, pursuant to Section 5913 of the Streets and Highways Code, the emergency or immediate necessity of
 the improvement.

(6) The amount of the assessment contract does not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or a monthly equivalent payment on the PACE assessment of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125), as adjusted by any annual increase in the California Consumer Price Index as determined pursuant to Section 2212 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, whichever is greater.

(f) The program administrator shall report annually all PACE assessments that were funded and recorded pursuant to subdivision (e) in a form acceptable to the commissioner. The commissioner shall include this information in the annual composite report prepared in accordance with Section 22160.

(g) (1) If there is a difference between the determination of the property owner’s ability to pay the annual PACE obligations and the
 actual amount financed for the property owner, and the property owner is obligated on the underlying home improvement contract, the program administrator shall be responsible for that difference. This subdivision does not apply in a case of intentional misrepresentation by the property owner. If the program administrator is responsible to pay the difference under this subdivision, the program administrator shall provide to the property owner a written disclosure of the methodology that the program administrator used to determine whether that there was a difference between the property owner’s ability to pay the annual PACE obligation and the actual amount financed for the property owner for purposes of this subdivision.

(2) This subdivision only applies to an assessment contract that was executed between April 1, 2018, and January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 813, Sec. 10.   (AB 2063)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22688.

A program administrator shall be subject to all provisions of the California Financial Information Privacy Act (Division 1.4 (commencing with Section 4050)) that are applicable to financial institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 798, Sec. 8.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22689.

(a) A program administrator shall not permit a PACE solicitor to do any of the following:

(1) Solicit a property owner to enter into an assessment contract with a program administrator, unless the PACE solicitor and the program administrator comply with the requirements of this chapter and any rules adopted by the commissioner.

(2) Engage in any act in violation of Section 5898.16 or 5898.17 of the Streets and Highways Code or Chapter 29.1 (commencing with Section 5900) of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Streets and Highways Code, including offering an assessment contract with terms, conditions, or disclosures that are not in compliance with applicable laws or that omits terms, conditions, or disclosures
 required by applicable law, excepting the reporting requirements of Section 5954 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) A program administrator shall be subject to the enforcement authority of the commissioner for any violations of this division, to the extent those violations have been committed by the program administrator or by a PACE solicitor authorized by that program administrator, in connection with activity related to that program administrator.

(c) A violation of any provision of Section 5898.16 or 5898.17 of the Streets and Highways Code or of any provision of Chapter 29.1 (commencing with Section 5900) of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Streets and Highways Code by a program administrator, excepting the reporting requirements of Section 5954 of the Streets and Highways Code, or by a PACE solicitor authorized by that program administrator in connection with activity related
 to that program administrator, shall be a violation of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 813, Sec. 11.   (AB 2063)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22690.

(a) A program administrator is subject to an inspection, examination, or investigation in accordance with Section 22701.

(b) If, in the course of an inspection, examination, or investigation of a program administrator, the commissioner has cause to believe that the program administrator, the PACE solicitor, or the PACE solicitor agent may have committed a violation of this division or any rule or order thereunder, or the commissioner seeks to obtain or provide information necessary to the commissioner in the administration of the division, with respect to a matter related to a PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent, and either this information is not available directly from the program administrator or the commissioner seeks to validate the information obtained from
 the program administrator, the commissioner may do the following:

(1) Inspect, examine, or investigate any and all documents, records, files, and communications of the PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent that are relevant to the violation or the matter. For purposes of the inspection, examination, or investigation, the commissioner and their representatives shall have access to the records of the PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent related to assessment contracts associated with the violation or matter.

(2) Require the attendance of witnesses and examine under oath all persons whose testimony is required relative to the violation or matter.

(c) If, upon inspection, examination, or investigation, the commissioner has cause to believe that a PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent is violating or has violated any
 provision of this division or any rule or order thereunder, the commissioner or their designee shall exhaust the procedure set forth in paragraph (1) before bringing any action authorized under paragraph (2).

(1) (A) The commissioner shall issue a report to the program administrator, the PACE solicitor, and, if applicable, the PACE solicitor agent, documenting the commissioner’s findings and, if applicable, requesting corrective action or a cessation of any violation of this division or any rule or order thereunder.

(B) The program administrator, PACE solicitor, and, if applicable, PACE solicitor agent, or any combination thereof, shall have the opportunity to provide a written answer to the report submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) within a reasonable period and shall document in its written answer any voluntary corrective action or other actions taken
 or planned to address the commissioner’s request. The commissioner shall shorten the period of time to provide a written answer to no greater than five business days if the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe that a person is conducting business as a PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent, or both, in an unsafe or injurious manner.

(C) If following the process outlined in subparagraphs (A) and (B), the commissioner believes further action is necessary or appropriate, the commissioner may do any of the following, in any combination:

(i) Demand a corrective action by the program administrator, PACE solicitor, PACE solicitor agent, or any combination thereof.

(ii) Demand the program administrator, PACE solicitor, PACE solicitor agent, or any combination thereof, stop violating the division, rule, or
 order.

(iii) Demand the PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent, or both, discontinue engaging in the business of soliciting property owners to enter into assessment contracts related to any or all program administrators, or demand the program administrator deauthorize the PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent, or both, for a defined period not exceeding 12 months, or indefinitely.

(2) (A) The commissioner may, upon exhaustion of the procedure in paragraph (1), bring an order against a PACE solicitor, PACE solicitor agent, or both, as provided in this paragraph. However, the commissioner shall, upon exhaustion of the procedure in paragraph (1), bring an order against a PACE solicitor, PACE solicitor agent, or both, as provided in this paragraph, following either of the following:

(i) The
 issuance of a demand pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1).

(ii) The issuance of a demand pursuant to clause (i) or (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) involving a violation of Section 22161, when the commissioner believes that the public’s interest will be served by the public nature of the order.

(B) The commissioner may order a PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent, or both, to desist and refrain from engaging in business as a PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent, or further violating this division, or the rules thereunder, in accordance with clause (i) and (ii) of this subparagraph. This paragraph does not authorize the commissioner to restrict the ability of a PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent to engage in any business that does not involve soliciting a property owner to enter into an assessment contract.

(i) If the order addresses unsafe or injurious behavior by a PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent, or both, the order shall be effective immediately. All other orders shall be effective once final.

(ii) If, within 30 days of the receipt of the order, the PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent, or both, fails to request a hearing, the order shall become final.

(iii) If, within 30 days of the receipt of the order, the PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent, or both, requests a hearing, the hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(C) The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for a hearing, by order, censure or suspend for a period
 not exceeding 12 months, or bar any natural person from directly or indirectly soliciting a property owner to enter into an assessment contract, in accordance with clause (i) to (iv), inclusive, of this subparagraph. This paragraph does not authorize the commissioner to restrict the ability of a natural person to engage in any business that does not involve soliciting a property owner to enter into an assessment contract, or being employed by a PACE solicitor in a capacity that does not involve soliciting a property owner to enter into an assessment contract.

(i) Within 15 days from the date of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to this subparagraph, the person may request a hearing under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(ii) Upon receipt of a request submitted pursuant to
 clause (i), the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 30 days after the commissioner receives the request pursuant to clause (i), unless the person subject to the notice consents to a later date.

(iii) If no hearing is requested within 15 days after the mailing or service of the notice of intention as described in clause (i), and the commissioner does not order a hearing, the right to a hearing shall be deemed to be waived.

(iv) Upon receipt of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to this subparagraph, the person who is the subject of the proposed order is immediately prohibited from directly or indirectly soliciting a property owner to enter into an assessment contract.

(d) An order brought under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall be public.

(e) A PACE solicitor or PACE solicitor agent subject to this section shall not be subject to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22700).

(f) The commissioner shall not be bound to the provisions of this section in connection with enforcement of this division with respect to a program administrator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 13.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22690.5.

(a) The department shall maintain, on its Internet Web site, the identities of enrolled PACE solicitors and PACE solicitor agents. The Internet Web site shall identify the date of the most recent update, and the frequency with which the list is updated. This subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2020.
